Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
ADMINISTRATION, POWERS AND DUTIES

[§159-6] Administration. The
department shall administer this chapter subject to the supervision of the
board. The board may delegate any of its powers except the power to make rules
and regulations or may direct any of its duties to be performed by any
appropriate agents, officers, or employees of the board.

The board may employ on a full or part-time
basis veterinarians and inspectors, subject to chapter 76, as are necessary to
carry out a uniform inspection system of meat or meat products in the State.
All inspectors shall be under the supervision and control of a veterinarian
employed by the board. [L 1969, c 214, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next